Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.060

Rules—National organic program—Violations—Penalties.

(1) The director shall adopt rules, in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW, as the director believes are appropriate for the adoption of the national organic program and for the proper administration of this chapter.

(2)(a) The director shall issue orders to producers, processors, or handlers whom the director finds are violating RCW 15.86.030 or 15.86.090 or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, to cease their violations and desist from future violations.

(b) Whenever the director finds that a producer, processor, or handler has committed a violation, the director shall impose on and collect from the violator a civil fine not exceeding the total of:

(i) The state's estimated costs of investigating and taking appropriate administrative and enforcement actions in respect to the violation; and

(ii) One thousand dollars.

[ 2010 c 109 s 4; 2002 c 220 s 4; 1992 c 71 s 7; 1985 c 247 s 6.]